Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-134
Peddlers; pawnbrokers; entertainers; licensing and regulation.

A city of the second class shall have the power by ordinance to license, tax, suppress, regulate, and prohibit hawkers, peddlers, pawnbrokers, theatrical and other exhibitions, shows, and other amusements and to revoke such licenses for violation of such ordinances.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5028;

C.S.1922, § 4197;

C.S.1929, § 17-136;

R.S.1943, § 17-134;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 27.
August 24, 2017